gl_ES.dic
abesourar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:abesóurar 
abrochar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i / < abrocho al:abróchar 
achantar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:achántar 
afectar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:aféctar 
agoirar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:agóirar 
alaparear/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:alaparéar 
aloular/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:alóular 
amoscar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i / moscar al:amóscar 
apedar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:apédar 
aquedar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:aquédar 
arrastrar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr al:arrástrar 
arrincar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:arríncar 
asfixiar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr / [ks] al:asfíxiar 
atrousar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:atróusar 
avogar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:avógar 
bafordar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:bafórdar 
batallar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:batállar 
boquexar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:boquéxar 
branquear/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:branquéar 
bular/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:búlar 
calar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i / baixar al:cálar 
cansar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr al:cánsar 
cavar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:cávar 
chalanear/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:chalanéar 
chegar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr al:chégar 
chorar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:chórar 
colear/220,221,230,231 po:verbo is:intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: i pr / cola3 al:coléar 
concursar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:concúrsar 
contestar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:contéstar 
croar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i / acocorar al:cróar 
dentar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:déntar 
desertar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:desértar 
discursar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:discúrsar 
empreñar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:empréñar 
enguedellar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr al:enguedéllar 
esbirrar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:esbírrar 
esgazar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:esgázar 
estoupar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:estóupar 
fervellar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:fervéllar 
fumar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:fúmar 
gostar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i / gustar=> al:góstar 
iñar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:íñar 
larbear/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:larbéar 
louquear/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:louquéar 
melear/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:meléar 
muchar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:múchar 
optar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:óptar 
pasar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal / auxiliar VOLG: t i pr al:pásar 
perseverar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:persevérar 
practicar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:practícar 
puvisar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:puvísar 
recalar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:recálar 
remar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:rémar 
retumbar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:reunifícar 
sacar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr al:sácar 
soprar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:sóprar 
tinguilear/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:tinguiléar 
tremelar/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:tremélar 
valsear/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:valséar 
xesticular/220,221 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG: i al:xesticúlar 
